New York, session 2025-2026, S5193.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (b) of section 1801 of the tax law, as added by 2 section 15 of subpart I of part V-1 of chapter 57 of the laws of 2009, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (b) For purposes of this [subdivision] section, "this chapter" 5 includes any "related statute" or any "related income or earnings tax 6 statute", as defined in section eighteen hundred of this article, or any 7 section under title two of article four of the real property tax law. 8 § 2. Subdivision (c) of section 11-4002 of the administrative code of 9 the city of New York, as added by chapter 201 of the laws of 2009, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 (c) For purposes of this chapter, the term "designated chapter" shall 12 mean chapter five, six, seven, eight, nine, eleven, twelve, thirteen, 13 fourteen, fifteen, twenty-one, twenty-two, twenty-three-A, twenty-four, 14 twenty-five or twenty-seven of this title, or any section under title 15 two of article four of the real property tax law. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06992-01-5